Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-167
Boards; designated; change in name; effect.

(1) Boards shall be designated as follows:

(a) Board of Athletic Training;

(b) Board of Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology;

(c) Board of Behavior Analysts;

(d) Board of Chiropractic;

(e) Board of Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art;

(f) Board of Dentistry;

(g) Board of Emergency Medical Services;

(h) Board of Registered Environmental Health Specialists;

(i) Board of Funeral Directing and Embalming;

(j) Board of Hearing Instrument Specialists;

(k) Board of Massage Therapy;

(l) Board of Medical Nutrition Therapy;

(m) Board of Medical Radiography;

(n) Board of Medicine and Surgery;

(o) Board of Mental Health Practice;

(p) Board of Nursing;

(q) Board of Nursing Home Administration;

(r) Board of Occupational Therapy Practice;

(s) Board of Optometry;

(t) Board of Pharmacy;

(u) Board of Physical Therapy;

(v) Board of Podiatry;

(w) Board of Psychology;

(x) Board of Respiratory Care Practice; and

(y) Board of Veterinary Medicine and Surgery.

(2) Any change made by the Legislature of the names of boards listed in this section shall not change the membership of such boards or affect the validity of any action taken by or the status of any action pending before any of such boards. Any such board newly named by the Legislature shall be the direct and only successor to the board as previously named.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 12, p. 457;

C.S.1929, § 71-302;

Laws 1935, c. 142, § 30, p. 530;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-302;

Laws 1943, c. 150, § 4, p. 540;

R.S.1943, § 71-112;

Laws 1957, c. 298, § 8, p. 1078;

Laws 1961, c. 337, § 6, p. 1053;

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 4;

Laws 1979, LB 427, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 451, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 481, § 9;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 277, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 32;

Laws 1986, LB 355, § 11;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 24;

Laws 1988, LB 557, § 16;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 187, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 14;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 14;

Laws 2000, LB 833, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 270, § 5;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 7;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 107;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-112;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 67;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 7;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 48;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 20;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 3.
July 1, 2026